Illinois, session 104th, HB3695.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12024 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12024 new)7    Sec. 5-12024. Restrictions on retail tobacco store 8locations. 9    (a) A county may adopt an ordinance to regulate the 10location of retail tobacco stores, as defined in Section 10 of 11the Smoke Free Illinois Act, in unincorporated areas near 12vulnerable areas, including schools, day care centers, and 13hospitals.14    (b) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect 15of prohibiting retail tobacco stores, as defined in Section 10 16of the Smoke Free Illinois Act, in unincorporated areas.